cs: Typ rukojeti plunger mute: Ergonomický úchop do dlaně; Integrovaný knoflík; Rukojeť se smyčkou; Bez rukojeti (pouze okraj); Tyčová rukojeť; Rukojeť s popruhem; Jiné
sk-SK: Typ rukoväte piestového dusítka: Ergonomická rukoväť pre dlaň; Integrovaný gombík; Slučková rukoväť; Bez rukoväti (len okraj); Paličková rukoväť; Popruhová rukoväť; Iné
hu: Plunger Mute hangfogó fogantyútípusa: Ergonomikus tenyérfogantyú; Beépített gomb; Hurokfogantyú; Fogantyú nélkül (csak perem); Botfogantyú; Pántos fogantyú; Egyéb
fi: Plunger-vaimentimen kahvan tyyppi: Ergonominen kämmenote; Integroitu nuppi; Lenkkikahva; Ei kahvaa (vain reunus); Varsi; Hihnakahva; Muu
ja: プランジャーミュートハンドルタイプ: 人間工学に基づいたパームグリップ; 一体型ノブ; ループハンドル; ハンドルなし (リムのみ); スティックハンドル; ストラップハンドル; その他
ro-RO: Tip de mâner al surdinei tip plunger: Prindere ergonomică pentru palmă; Buton integrat; Mâner tip buclă; Fără mâner (doar margine); Mâner tip baston; Mâner tip curea; Altele
ko: 플런저 뮤트 핸들형: 인체공학적 팜 그립; 일체형 노브; 루프 핸들; 핸들 없음(림 전용); 스틱 핸들; 스트랩 핸들; 기타
fr: Type de poignée de la sourdine à ventouse: Poignée palmaire ergonomique; Bouton intégré; Poignée en boucle; Sans poignée (rebord uniquement); Poignée droite; Poignée en sangle; Autre
nb: Håndtaksstil på plungerdemper: Ergonomisk håndflategrep; Integrert knott; Løkkehåndtak; Uten håndtak (kun kant); Stanghåndtak; Stropphåndtak; Annet
zh-CN: 活塞式消音手柄类型: 人体工学手柄; 一体式旋钮; 环形手柄; 无手柄（仅有边缘）; 棒状手柄; 绑带手柄; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de identificador de silenciador de desentupidor: Pega ergonómica para a palma da mão; Botão integrado; Pega em laço; Sem pega (apenas rebordo); Pega em bastão; Pega em correia; Outro
nl: Plunger mute handgreeptype: Ergonomische handgreep; Geïntegreerde knop; Lushandgreep; Zonder handgreep (alleen rand); Stokhandgreep; Riemhandgreep; Overig
pt-BR: Surdina plunger tipo de alça: Pega ergonômica para palma da mão; Botão integrado; Alça; Sem alça (apenas borda); Alça em bastão; Alça de correia; Outro
el: Τύπος λαβής της σουρντίνας: Εργονομική λαβή παλάμης; Ενσωματωμένο πόμολο; Λαβή με θηλιά; Χωρίς λαβή (μόνο χείλος); Λαβή σε σχήμα ραβδιού; Λαβή με λουράκι; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta ročaja piščali/flavte: Ergonomski oprijem za dlan; Vgrajen gumb; Ročaj z zanko; Brez ročaja (samo rob); Paličasti ročaj; Ročaj s pasom; Drugo
da: Type svuppersordin-håndtag: Ergonomisk håndfladegreb; Integreret knop; Løkkehåndtag; Intet håndtag (kun kant); Pindehåndtag; Remhåndtag; Andet
en: Plunger mute handle type: Ergonomic palm grip; Integrated knob; Loop handle; No handle (rim-only); Stick handle; Strap handle; Other
lt-LT: Plunger duslintuvo rankenos tipas: Ergonomiška rankena; Integruota rankenėlė; Kilpos formos rankena; Be rankenos (tik kraštas); Koto formos rankena; Dirželio formos rankena; Kita
bg-BG: Тип дръжка с бутон за заглушаване: Ергономичен захват за длан; Вградено копче; Дръжка тип примка; Без дръжка (само ръб); Дръжка тип пръчка; Дръжка тип каишка; Други
ru: Тип рукоятки плунжерной сурдины: Эргономичный захват; Встроенная ручка-кнопка; Ручка-петля; Без ручки (только обод); Ручка-стержень; Ручка-ремешок; Другое
zh-TW: 馬桶塞弱音器握柄類型: 人體工學手柄; 一體式旋鈕; 環形把手; 無把手 (僅邊緣); 棒狀把手; 綁帶把手; 其他
sv: Typ av handtag för plungerdämpare: Ergonomiskt handflategrepp; Integrerad knopp; Öglehandtag; Inget handtag (endast kant); Pinnhandtag; Remhandtag; Övrigt
it: Tipo di impugnatura del silenziatore a stantuffo: Impugnatura ergonomica; Manopola integrata; Impugnatura ad anello; Senza impugnatura (solo bordo); Impugnatura a bastone; Impugnatura a cinghia; Altro
tr: Pistonlu susturucu tutma kolu tipi: Ergonomik avuç içi tutacağı; Entegre topuz; Halka tutacak; Tutacaksız (sadece kenar); Çubuk tutacak; Kayış tutacak; Diğer
es: Tipo de identificador de silencio del émbolo: Agarre de palma ergonómico; Perilla integrada; Mango de lazo; Sin mango (solo borde); Mango de palo; Mango de correa; Otro
pl: Typ uchwytu tłumika plunger: Ergonomiczny uchwyt na dłoń; Zintegrowane pokrętło; Uchwyt z pętlą; Bez rączki (tylko krawędź); Rączka typu patyk; Rączka z paskiem; Inne
hr-HR: Plunger mute korisničko ime tipa: Ergonomski rukohvat za dlan; Ugrađeni gumb; Ručka u obliku petlje; Bez ručke (samo rub); Ravna ručka; Ručka u obliku remena; Ostalo
th: ด้ามจับแบบปิดเสียงชนิดลูกสูบ: ด้ามจับตามหลักสรีรศาสตร์; ปุ่มจับในตัว; ด้ามจับแบบห่วง; ไม่มีด้ามจับ (เฉพาะขอบ); ด้ามจับแบบแท่ง; ด้ามจับแบบสายรัด; อื่นๆ
vi: Tay cầm giảm tiếng ồn kiểu pít tông: Tay cầm vừa lòng bàn tay; Núm vặn tích hợp; Tay cầm dạng vòng; Không tay cầm (chỉ có vành); Tay cầm dạng que; Tay cầm dạng dây đeo; Khác
de: Art des Griffs des Plunger-Dämpfers: Ergonomischer Handflächengriff; Integrierter Knauf; Schlaufengriff; Kein Griff (nur Rand); Stabgriff; Riemengriff; Sonstige